New Jersey, session 221, A2077.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 9 of P.L.1996, c.25 (C.34:1B-120) is amended to read as follows: 9.  a.  As determined by the authority, a business which is awarded a grant of tax credits under P.L.1996, c.25 (C.34:1B-112 et seq.) shall submit annually, no later than March 1st of each year, commencing in the year in which the grant of tax credits is issued and for the remainder of the commitment duration, a certificate of compliance that indicates that the business continues to maintain the number of retained full-time jobs as specified in the project agreement. Upon receipt and review thereof during the tax credit term, the authority shall issue a certificate of compliance indicating the amount of tax credits that the business may apply against liability pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2004, c.65 (C.34:1B-115.3). Any reduction in the number of retained full-time jobs below the number prescribed under the terms of the project agreement shall proportionately reduce the amount of tax credits the business may apply against liability in that tax period and the credits that may no longer be applied for that tax period shall be forfeited. However, if in any tax period, the number of retained full-time jobs drops below the minimum number of retained full-time jobs indicated in the paragraph of subsection b. of section 7 of P.L.2004, c.65 (C.34:1B-115.3) pursuant to which the project agreement was executed such that the business would no longer be eligible to apply the credits for the number of years for which it was approved, then the authority shall reduce the amount of tax credits the business may apply against liability and the number of years in which the business may apply the tax credits. The grant shall be subject to recapture provisions pursuant to the project agreement. b.    Following the termination of the public health emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to Executive Order No. 103 of 2020, as extended, a business that has entered into an incentive agreement may elect, before December 31, 2023, to waive, for the period beginning on July 1, 2022 and ending on December 31, 2023, the requirement that a full-time employee who is employed by the business shall spend at least 60 percent of the employee's time at the qualified business facility; provided, however, that a business that makes such an election shall satisfy the following criteria: (1)   any full-time employee employed by the business shall spend at least 10 percent of the employee's time at the qualified business facility [through] for the 2023 tax period only; and (2)   following the receipt by the business of its tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate for the 2022 tax period, the business shall make a payment of an amount equal to five percent of the amount of tax credit the business receives for the 2022 tax period, which payment shall be made to the authority, and which payment the authority shall hold and make available for the provision of loans, guarantees, equity investments, and grants, or other forms of financing to support small business and downtown or commercial corridor activation activities within the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located, as may be designated by the chief executive officer of the authority. c.     For the 2024 tax period and all subsequent tax periods, a business may elect to waive for each tax period the requirement that a full-time employee who is employed by the business shall spend at least 60 percent of the employees time at the qualified business facility; provided, however, that a business that makes such an election shall satisfy the following criteria: (1) to qualify as an eligible position or full-time job, the business shall demonstrate to the authoritys satisfaction that the employee spends at least 80 percent of the employees work time in this State and that the eligible position requires an employee to have the employees primary place of work in this State, which need not be at the qualified business facility for the business to receive the full award amount; (2) not less than 80 percent of the aggregate withholdings of new and retained full-time jobs at the business shall be subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., except for an employee who is a resident of another state and whose income is not subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., due to a reciprocity agreement with another state; and (3) following the receipt by the business of its tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate for such tax period that an election is made, the business shall make a payment of an amount equal to five percent of the amount of the tax credit the business receives for such tax period, which payment shall be made to the authority, and which payment the authority shall hold and make available for the provision of loans, guarantees, equity investments, and grants, or other forms of financing to support small business and downtown or commercial corridor activation activities within the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located, as may be designated by the chief executive officer of the authority. (cf: P.L.2022, c.134, s.1) 2.    Section 6 of P.L.1996, c.26 (C.34:1B-129) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.  The amount of the employment incentive awarded as a grant by the authority shall either be awarded in cash or as a tax credit. In each case, the amount of the grant shall be not less than 10 percent and not more than 50 percent of the withholdings of the business, or not less than 10 percent and not more than 30 percent of the estimated tax of the partners of an eligible partnership whether paid directly by the partner or by the eligible partnership on behalf of the partner's account, or any combination thereof, and shall be subject to the provisions of sections 10 and 11 of P.L.1996, c.26 (C.34:1B-133 and C.34:1B-134). In no case shall the aggregate amount of the employment incentive grant awarded pursuant to a business employment incentive agreement entered into on or after July 1, 2003 exceed an average of $50,000 for all new employees over the term of the grant. The employment incentive shall be based on criteria developed by the authority after considering the following: (1)   The number of eligible positions to be created; (2)   The expected duration of those positions; (3)   The type of contribution the business can make to the long-term growth of the State's economy; (4)   The amount of other financial assistance the business will receive from the State for the project; (5)   The total dollar investment the business is making in the project; (6)   Whether the business is a designated industry; (7)   Impact of the business on State tax revenues; and (8)   Such other related factors determined by the authority. b.    A business may be eligible to be awarded a grant, either in cash or in tax credits, of up to 80 percent of the withholdings of the business or up to 50 percent of the estimated tax of the partners of an eligible partnership if the grant promotes smart growth and the goals, strategies, and policies of the State Development and Redevelopment Plan, established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-200), as determined by and based upon criteria promulgated by the authority following consultation with the Office of State Planning in the Department of State. c.     The term of the grant shall not exceed 10 years. d.    At the discretion of the authority, the grant may apply to new employees or partners in eligible positions created during the base years, and during the remainder of the term of the grant. e.     Within 180 days of the date of enactment of P.L.2015, c.194 (C.34:1B-137.1 et al.), a business that was approved for a grant prior to the enactment of P.L.2015, c.194 (C.34:1B-137.1 et al.), may direct the authority to convert the grant to a tax credit against the tax liability otherwise due pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and 54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5. The direction to convert the grant to a tax credit shall be irrevocable. An approved tax credit shall be issued in the manner and for the amounts as follows and may only be applied in the tax period for which they are issued and shall not be carried forward: (1)   For grants accrued but not paid during calendar years 2008 through 2013, the tax credit shall be equal to an approved amount and shall be issued in five installments over a five-year period beginning in the 2017 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee in the following percentages: in year one, five percent of the accrued amount; in year two, 20 percent of the accrued amount; in year three, 25 percent of the accrued amount; in year four, 25 percent of the accrued amount; in year five, 25 percent of the accrued amount. To the extent any amount in this paragraph has not been approved by the authority by the commencement of State fiscal year 2017, the aggregate tax credit that would have been issued in State fiscal year 2017 shall be issued in the year the amount is approved and the five-year period shall commence in that fiscal year; (2)   For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2014, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in four equal installments over a four-year period beginning in the 2019 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (3)   For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2015, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in four equal installments over a four-year period beginning in the 2019 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (4)   For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2016, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in three equal installments over a three-year period beginning in the 2020 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (5)   For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2017, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in three equal installments over a three-year period beginning in the 2020 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (6)   For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2018, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in two equal installments over a two-year period beginning in the 2022 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (7)   For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2019, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in two equal installments over a two-year period beginning in the 2022 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (8)   For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2020, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in two equal installments over a two-year period beginning in the 2023 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (9)   For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2021, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in two equal installments over a two-year period beginning in the 2023 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (10)  For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2022, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be paid in two equal installments over a two-year period beginning in the 2023 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (11)  For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2023, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in two equal installments over a two-year period beginning in the 2023 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; (12)  For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2024, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in the 2025 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee; and (13)  For a grant accrued but not paid during calendar year 2025, the tax credit shall be equal to any approved amount and shall be issued in the 2025 tax accounting or privilege period of the business or tax credit transferee. f.     The amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section shall be applied against the tax otherwise due under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5, prior to all other credits and payments. If the credit exceeds the amount of tax liability otherwise due from a business that pays taxes under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5, that amount of excess shall be an overpayment for the purposes of R.S.54:49-15, provided, however, that section 7 of P.L.1992, c.175 (C.54:49-15.1) shall not apply. g.    (1) A business that does not pay taxes under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and 54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5 may apply to the executive director of the authority for a tax credit transfer certificate, covering one or more years. (2)   A business that has received a tax credit pursuant to subsection e. of this section, which credit exceeds the amount of the tax liability otherwise due, may apply to the executive director of the authority for a tax credit transfer certificate, covering one or more years. (3)   Upon the executive director's approval of an application for a tax credit transfer certificate, the division shall review and issue the tax credit transfer certificate. The tax credit transfer certificate, upon receipt thereof by the business, may be sold or assigned, in full or in part, in an amount not less than $100,000, or the amount of the refundable tax credit issued if less than $100,000, of tax credits to any other person that may have a tax liability pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and 54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5. The tax credit transfer certificate provided to the business shall include a statement waiving the business's right to claim that amount of the credit against the taxes that the business has elected to sell or assign. The sale or assignment of any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this section shall not be exchanged for consideration received by the business of less than 75 percent of the transferred credit amount before considering any further discounting to present value which shall be permitted. Any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate used by a purchaser or assignee against a tax liability shall be subject to the same privileges, limitations, and conditions that apply to the use of the credit by the business that originally applied for and was allowed the tax credit, including treating the amount of excess as an overpayment under subsection f. of this section. The tax credit transferee may not transfer its tax credit to any other party. h.    Following the termination of the public health emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to Executive Order No. 103 of 2020, as extended, a business that has entered into an incentive agreement may elect, before December 31, 2023, to waive, for the period beginning on July 1, 2022 and ending on December 31, 2023, the requirement that a full-time employee who is employed by the business shall spend at least 60 percent of the employee's time at the qualified business facility; provided, however, that a business that makes such an election shall satisfy the following criteria: (1) any full-time employee employed by the business shall spend at least 10 percent of the employee's time at the qualified business facility [through] for the 2023 tax period only; and (2) following the receipt by the business of its tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate for the 2022 tax period, the business shall make a payment of an amount equal to five percent of the amount of tax credit the business receives for the 2022 tax period, which payment shall be made to the authority, and which payment the authority shall hold and make available for the provision of loans, guarantees, equity investments, and grants, or other forms of financing to support small business and downtown or commercial corridor activation activities within the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located, as may be designated by the chief executive officer of the authority. i.     For the 2024 tax period and all subsequent tax periods, a business may elect to waive for each tax period the requirement that a full-time employee who is employed by the business shall spend at least 60 percent of the employees time at the qualified business facility; provided, however, that a business that makes such an election shall satisfy the following criteria: (1)   to qualify as an eligible position or full-time job, the business must demonstrate to the authoritys satisfaction that the employee spends at least 80 percent of the employees work time in this State and that the eligible position requires an employee to have the employees primary place of work in this State, which need not be at the qualified business facility for the business to receive the full award amount; (2)   not less than 80 percent of the aggregate withholdings of new and retained full-time jobs at the business shall be subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., except for an employee who is a resident of another state and whose income is not subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., due to a reciprocity agreement with another state; and (3)   following the receipt by the business of its tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate for such tax period that an election is made, the business shall make a payment of an amount equal to five percent of the amount of tax credit the business receives for such tax period, which payment shall be made to the authority, and which payment the authority shall hold and make available for the provision of loans, guarantees, equity investments, and grants, or other forms of financing to support small business and downtown or commercial corridor activation activities within the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located, as may be designated by the chief executive officer of the authority. (cf: P.L.2022, c.134, s.2) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-209) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  (1)  A business, upon application to and approval from the authority, shall be allowed a credit of 100 percent of its capital investment, made after the effective date of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-207 et seq.) but prior to its submission of documentation pursuant to subsection c. of this section, in a qualified business facility within an eligible municipality, pursuant to the restrictions and requirements of this section. To be eligible for any tax credits authorized under this section, a business shall demonstrate to the authority, at the time of application, that the State's financial support of the proposed capital investment in a qualified business facility will yield a net positive benefit to both the State and the eligible municipality. The value of all credits approved by the authority pursuant to P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-207 et seq.) shall not exceed $1,750,000,000, except as may be increased by the authority as set forth in paragraph (5) of subsection a. of section 35 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.34:1B-209.3) and section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4). (2)   A business, other than a tenant eligible pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection, shall make or acquire capital investments totaling not less than $50,000,000 in a qualified business facility, at which the business shall employ not fewer than 250 full-time employees to be eligible for a credit under this section. A business that acquires a qualified business facility shall also be deemed to have acquired the capital investment made or acquired by the seller. (3)   A business that is a tenant in a qualified business facility, the owner of which has made or acquired capital investments in the facility totaling not less than $50,000,000, shall occupy a leased area of the qualified business facility that represents at least $17,500,000 of the capital investment in the facility at which the tenant business and up to two other tenants in the qualified business facility shall employ not fewer than 250 full-time employees in the aggregate to be eligible for a credit under this section. The amount of capital investment in a facility that a leased area represents shall be equal to that percentage of the owner's total capital investment in the facility that the percentage of net leasable area leased by the tenant is of the total net leasable area of the qualified business facility. Capital investments made by a tenant shall be deemed to be included in the calculation of the capital investment made or acquired by the owner, but only to the extent necessary to meet the owner's minimum capital investment of $50,000,000. Capital investments made by a tenant and not allocated to meet the owner's minimum capital investment threshold of $50,000,000 shall be added to the amount of capital investment represented by the tenant's leased area in the qualified business facility. (4)   A business shall not be allowed tax credits under this section if the business participates in a business employment incentive agreement, pursuant to P.L.1996, c.26 (C.34:1B-124 et seq.), relating to the same capital and employees that qualify the business for this credit, or if the business receives assistance pursuant to P.L.1996, c.25 (C.34:1B-112 et seq.). A business that is allowed a tax credit under this section shall not be eligible for incentives authorized pursuant to P.L.2002, c.43 (C.52:27BBB-1 et al.). A business shall not qualify for a tax credit under this section, based upon its capital investment and the employment of full-time employees, if that capital investment or employment was the basis for which a grant was provided to the business pursuant to the "InvestNJ Business Grant Program Act," P.L.2008, c.112 (C.34:1B-237 et seq.). (5)   Full-time employment for an accounting or a privilege period shall be determined as the average of the monthly full-time employment for the period. (6)   The capital investment of the owner of a qualified business facility is that percentage of the capital investment made or acquired by the owner of the building that the percentage of net leasable area of the qualified business facility not leased to tenants is of the total net leasable area of the qualified business facility. (7)   A business shall be allowed a tax credit of 100 percent of its capital investment, made after the effective date of P.L.2011, c.89 but prior to its submission of documentation pursuant to subsection c. of this section, in a qualified business facility that is part of a mixed use project, provided that (a) the qualified business facility represents at least $17,500,000 of the total capital investment in the mixed use project, (b) the business employs not fewer than 250 full-time employees in the qualified business facility, and (c) the total capital investment in the mixed use project of which the qualified business facility is a part is not less than $50,000,000. The allowance of credits under this paragraph shall be subject to the restrictions and requirements, to the extent that those are not inconsistent with the provisions of this paragraph, set forth in paragraphs (1) through (6) of this subsection, including, but not limited to, the requirement that the business shall demonstrate to the authority, at the time of application, that the State's financial support of the proposed capital investment in a qualified business facility will yield a net positive benefit to both the State and the eligible municipality. (8)   In determining whether a proposed capital investment will yield a net positive benefit, the authority shall not consider the transfer of an existing job from one location in the State to another location in the State as the creation of a new job, unless (a) the business proposes to transfer existing jobs to a municipality in the State as part of a consolidation of business operations from two or more other locations that are not in the same municipality whether in-State or out-of-State, or (b) the business's chief executive officer, or equivalent officer, submits a certification to the authority indicating that the existing jobs are at risk of leaving the State and that the business's chief executive officer, or equivalent officer, has reviewed the information submitted to the authority and that the representations contained therein are accurate, and the business intends to employ not fewer than 500 full-time employees in the qualified business facility. In the event that this certification by the business's chief executive officer, or equivalent officer, is found to be willfully false, the authority may revoke any award of tax credits in their entirety, which revocation shall be in addition to any other criminal or civil penalties that the business and the officer may be subject to. When considering an application involving intra-State job transfers, the authority shall require the company to submit the following information as part of its application: a full economic analysis of all locations under consideration by the company; all lease agreements, ownership documents, or substantially similar documentation for the business's current in-State locations; and all lease agreements, ownership documents, or substantially similar documentation for the potential out-of-State location alternatives, to the extent they exist. Based on this information, and any other information deemed relevant by the authority, the authority shall independently verify and confirm, by way of making a factual finding by separate vote of the authority's board, the business's assertion that the jobs are actually at risk of leaving the State, before a business may be awarded any tax credits under this section. b.    (1)  If applications under this section have been received by the authority prior to the effective date of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.), then, to the extent that there remains sufficient financial authorization for the award of a tax credit, the authority is authorized to consider those applications and to make awards of tax credits to eligible applicants, provided that the authority shall take final action on those applications no later than December 31, 2013. (2)   A business shall apply for the credit under this section prior to the effective date of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.), and shall submit its documentation for approval of its credit amount no later than December 31, 2023. (3)   If a business has submitted an application under this section and that application has not been approved for any reason, the lack of approval shall not serve to prejudice in any way the consideration of a new application as may be submitted for the qualified business facility for the provision of incentives offered pursuant to the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.). (4)   Tax credits awarded pursuant to P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-207 et seq.) for applications submitted to and approved by the authority prior to the effective date of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.), shall be administered by the authority in the manner established prior to that date. (5)   With respect to an application received by the authority prior to the effective date of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.) for a qualified business facility that is located on or adjacent to the campus of an acute care medical facility, (a) the minimum number of full-time employees required for eligibility under the program may be employed by any number of tenants or other occupants of the facility, in the aggregate, and the initial satisfaction of the requirement following completion of the project shall be deemed to satisfy the employment requirements of the program in all respects, and (b) if the capital investment in the facility exceeds $100,000,000, the determination of the net positive benefit yield shall be based on the benefits generated during a period of up to 30 years following the completion of the project, as determined by the authority. c.     (1)  The amount of credit allowed shall, except as otherwise provided, be equal to the capital investment made by the business, or the capital investment represented by the business's leased area, or area owned by the business as a condominium, and shall be taken over a 10-year period, at the rate of one-tenth of the total amount of the business's credit for each tax accounting or privilege period of the business, beginning with the tax period in which the business is first certified by the authority as having met the investment capital and employment qualifications, subject to any reduction or disqualification as provided by subsection d. of this section as determined by annual review by the authority. In conducting its annual review, the authority may require a business to submit any information determined by the authority to be necessary and relevant to its review. The credit amount that may be taken for a tax period of the business that exceeds the final liabilities of the business for the tax period may be carried forward for use by the business in the next 20 successive tax periods, and shall expire thereafter, provided that the value of all credits approved by the authority against tax liabilities pursuant to P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-207 et seq.) in any fiscal year shall not exceed $260,000,000. The amount of credit allowed for a tax period to a business that is a tenant in a qualified business facility shall not exceed the business's total lease payments for occupancy of the qualified business facility for the tax period. A business may elect to suspend its obligations for the 2020, 2021, 2022, or 2023 tax period, or any combination thereof, due to the COVID-19 pandemic, provided that the business shall make such election in writing to the authority before the issuance of the tax credit for the corresponding tax year and such suspension shall extend the term of the eligibility period by a corresponding amount of time. The authority shall modify the approval letter, and the business shall execute the modification within the time period provided by the authority. The modification shall provide that the failure to submit the annual report due to the suspension shall not be a forfeiture or an uncertified tax period. (2)   A business that is a partnership shall not be allowed a credit under this section directly, but the amount of credit of an owner of a business shall be determined by allocating to each owner of the partnership that proportion of the credit of the business that is equal to the owner of the partnership's share, whether or not distributed, of the total distributive income or gain of the partnership for its tax period ending within or at the end of the owner's tax period, or that proportion that is allocated by an agreement, if any, among the owners of the partnership that has been provided to the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury by the time and accompanied by the additional information as the director may require. (3)   The amount of credit allowed may be applied against the tax liability otherwise due pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), pursuant to sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or pursuant to N.J.S.17B:23-5. d.    (1)  If, in any tax period, fewer than 200 full-time employees of the business at the qualified business facility are employed in new full-time positions, the amount of the credit otherwise determined pursuant to final calculation of the award of tax credits pursuant to subsection c. of this section shall be reduced by 20 percent for that tax period and each subsequent tax period until the first period for which documentation demonstrating the restoration of the 200 full-time employees employed in new full-time positions at the qualified business facility has been reviewed and approved by the authority, for which tax period and each subsequent tax period the full amount of the credit shall be allowed; provided, however, that for businesses applying before January 1, 2010, there shall be no reduction if a business relocates to an urban transit hub from another location or other locations in the same municipality. For the purposes of this paragraph, a "new full-time position" means a position created by the business at the qualified business facility that did not previously exist in this State. (2)   If, in any tax period, the business reduces the total number of full-time employees in its Statewide workforce by more than 20 percent from the number of full-time employees in its Statewide workforce in the last tax accounting or privilege period prior to the credit amount approval under subsection a. of this section, then the business shall forfeit its credit amount for that tax period and each subsequent tax period, until the first tax period for which documentation demonstrating the restoration of the business's Statewide workforce to the threshold levels required by this paragraph has been reviewed and approved by the authority, for which tax period and each subsequent tax period the full amount of the credit shall be allowed. (3)   If, in any tax period, (a) the number of full-time employees employed by the business at the qualified business facility located in an urban transit hub within an eligible municipality drops below 250, or (b) the number of full-time employees, who are not the subject of intra-State job transfers, pursuant to paragraph (8) of subsection a. of this section, employed by the business at any other business facility in the State, whether or not located in an urban transit hub within an eligible municipality, drops by more than 20 percent from the number of full-time employees in its workforce in the last tax accounting or privilege period prior to the credit amount approval under this section, then the business shall forfeit its credit amount for that tax period and each subsequent tax period, until the first tax period for which documentation demonstrating the restoration of the number of full-time employees employed by the business at the qualified business facility to 250 or an increase above the 20 percent reduction has been reviewed and approved by the authority, for which tax period and each subsequent tax period the full amount of the credit shall be allowed. (4)   (i)  If the qualified business facility is sold in whole or in part during the 10-year eligibility period, the new owner shall not acquire the capital investment of the seller and the seller shall forfeit all credits for the tax period in which the sale occurs and all subsequent tax periods; provided, however, that any credits of tenants shall remain unaffected. (ii)   If a tenant subleases its tenancy in whole or in part during the 10-year eligibility period, the new tenant shall not acquire the credit of the sublessor, and the sublessor tenant shall forfeit all credits for the tax period of its sublease and all subsequent tax periods. (5)   Following the termination of the public health emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to Executive Order No. 103 of 2020, as extended, a business that has entered into an incentive agreement may elect, before December 31, 2023, to waive, for the period beginning on July 1, 2022 and ending on December 31, 2023, the requirement that a full-time employee who is employed by the business shall spend at least 60 percent of the employee's time at the qualified business facility; provided, however, that a business that makes such an election shall satisfy the following criteria: (i)    any full-time employee employed by the business shall spend at least 10 percent of the employee's time at the qualified business facility [through] for the 2023 tax period only; and (ii)   following the receipt by the business of its tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate for the 2022 tax period, the business shall make a payment of an amount equal to five percent of the amount of tax credit the business receives for the 2022 tax period, which payment shall be made to the authority, and which payment the authority shall hold and make available for the provision of loans, guarantees, equity investments, and grants, or other forms of financing to support small business and downtown or commercial corridor activation activities within the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located, as may be designated by the chief executive officer of the authority. (6)   For the 2024 tax period and all subsequent tax periods, a business may elect to waive for each tax period the requirement that a full-time employee who is employed by the business shall spend at least 60 percent of the employees time at the qualified business facility; provided, however, that a business that makes such an election shall satisfy the following criteria: (i) to qualify as an eligible position or full-time job, the business shall demonstrate to the authoritys satisfaction that the employee spends at least 80 percent of the employees work time in this State and that the eligible position requires an employee to have the employees primary place of work in this State, which need not be at the qualified business facility for the business to receive the full award amount; (ii) not less than 80 percent of the aggregate withholdings of new and retained full-time jobs at the business shall be subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., except for an employee who is a resident of another state and whose income is not subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., due to a reciprocity agreement with another state; and (iii) following the receipt by the business of its tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate for such tax period that an election is made, the business shall make a payment of an amount equal to five percent of the amount of tax credit the business receives for such tax period, which payment shall be made to the authority, and which payment the authority shall hold and make available for the provision of loans, guarantees, equity investments, and grants, or other forms of financing to support small business and downtown or commercial corridor activation activities within the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located, as may be designated by the chief executive officer of the authority. e.     (1)  The Executive Director of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury, shall adopt rules in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as are necessary to implement P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-207 et seq.), including, but not limited to: examples of and the determination of capital investment; the enumeration of eligible municipalities; specific delineation of urban transit hubs; the determination of the limits, if any, on the expense or type of furnishings that may constitute capital improvements; the promulgation of procedures and forms necessary to apply for a credit, including the enumeration of the certification procedures and allocation of tax credits for different phases of a qualified business facility or mixed use project; and provisions for credit applicants to be charged an initial application fee, and ongoing service fees, to cover the administrative costs related to the credit. (2)   Through regulation, the authority shall establish standards based on the green building manual prepared by the Commissioner of Community Affairs, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.132 (C.52:27D-130.6), regarding the use of renewable energy, energy-efficient technology, and non-renewable resources in order to reduce environmental degradation and encourage long-term cost reduction. f.     A business that has executed an approval letter may request before December 31, 2023 to terminate the award, commencing with the 2020 tax period or any subsequent tax period ending on or before December 31, 2023, due to the COVID-19 public health emergency; provided that the business shall submit a certification from the business's chief executive officer or equivalent officer stating that the termination is due, directly or indirectly, to the public health emergency and describing the impact of the public health emergency on the business. All credits for the tax period in which the termination is requested and all subsequent tax periods shall be forfeited, provided however that any credits of the business shall remain unaffected. A termination agreement executed by the authority and business shall not be amended. (cf: P.L.2022, c.134, s.3) 4.    Section 6 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-247) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.  (1)  The combined value of all credits approved by the authority pursuant to P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-207 et seq.) and P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-242 et al.) prior to December 31, 2013 shall not exceed $1,750,000,000, except as may be increased by the authority as set forth in paragraph (5) of subsection a. of section 35 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.34:1B-209.3). Following the enactment of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.), there shall be no monetary cap on the value of credits approved by the authority attributable to the program pursuant to the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.). (2)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2013, c.161) (3)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2013, c.161) (4)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2013, c.161) (5)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2013, c.161) b.    (1)  A business shall submit an application for tax credits prior to July 1, 2019. The authority shall not approve an application for tax credits unless the application was submitted prior to July 1, 2019. (2)   (a)  A business shall submit its documentation indicating that it has met the capital investment and employment requirements and all conditions of approvals specified in the incentive agreement for certification of its tax credit amount, to the authority's satisfaction, within three years following the date of approval of its application by the authority. The authority shall have the discretion to grant two six-month extensions of this deadline. If the authority accepts the documentation, the authority shall request that the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury issue a tax credit based on the approved documentation to be used by the business during the eligibility period. Except as provided in subparagraphs (b) and (c) of this paragraph, in no event shall the incentive effective date occur later than four years following the date of approval of an application by the authority. (b)   As of the effective date of P.L.2017, c.314, a business which applied for the tax credit prior to July 1, 2014 under P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-242 et al.), shall submit its documentation to the authority no later than July 28, 2019, indicating that it has met the capital investment and employment requirements specified in the incentive agreement for certification of its tax credit amount. (c)   If the Governor declares an emergency, then the chief executive officer of the authority shall have the discretion to grant an extension for the duration of the emergency and the board of the authority, upon recommendation of the chief executive officer, may grant two additional six-month extensions; provided that (i) the extensions are due to the economic disruption caused by the emergency; (ii) the project is delayed due to unforeseeable acts related to the project beyond the eligible business's control and without its fault or negligence; (iii) the eligible business is using best efforts, with all due diligence, to proceed with the completion of the project and the submission of the certification; and (iv) the eligible business has made, and continues to make, all reasonable efforts to prevent, avoid, mitigate, and overcome the delay. (3)   Full-time employment for an accounting or privilege period shall be determined as the average of the monthly full-time employment for the period. (4)   A business seeking a credit for a mega project shall apply for the credit within four years after the effective date of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.). c.     (1)  In conducting its annual review, the authority may require a business to submit any information determined by the authority to be necessary and relevant to its review. [The credit amount for any tax period for which the documentation of a business's credit amount remains uncertified as of a date three years after the closing date of that period shall be forfeited, although credit amounts for the remainder of the years of the eligibility period shall remain available to it.] The credit amount may be taken by the tax certificate holder for the tax period for which it was issued or may be carried forward for use by the tax certificate holder in any of the next 20 successive tax periods, and shall expire thereafter. The tax certificate holder may transfer the tax credit amount on or after the date of issuance or at any time [within three years of] after the date of issuance for use by the transferee in the tax period for which it was issued or in any of the next 20 successive tax periods Notwithstanding the foregoing, no more than the amount of tax credits equal to the total credit amount divided by the duration of the eligibility period in years may be taken in any tax period. A business may elect to suspend its obligations for the 2020, 2021, 2022, or 2023 tax period, or any combination thereof, due to the COVID-19 pandemic, provided that the business shall make such election in writing to the authority before the issuance of the tax credit for the corresponding tax year and such suspension shall extend the term of the eligibility period by a corresponding amount of time. The authority shall amend the incentive agreement, and the business shall execute the amended incentive agreement within the time period provided by the authority. The amended incentive agreement shall provide that the failure to submit the annual report due to the suspension shall not be a forfeiture or an uncertified tax period. (2)   Credits granted to a partnership shall be passed through to the partners, members, or owners, respectively, pro-rata or pursuant to an executed agreement among the partners, members, or owners documenting an alternate distribution method provided to the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury accompanied by any additional information as the director may require. (3)   The amount of credit allowed may be applied against the tax liability otherwise due pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), pursuant to sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or pursuant to N.J.S.17B:23-5. (4)   In order to respond to the profoundly negative impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on the State's economy and finances, the authority may request a tax certificate holder, at the tax certificate holder's discretion, to defer the application of a credit amount allowed pursuant to this section to a later tax period. Upon request, the authority and the tax certificate holder shall negotiate the terms of the deferral, which shall hold the certificate holder harmless, which will be made in the incentive agreement or as an addendum to the incentive agreement. d.    (1)  If, in any tax period, the business reduces the total number of full-time employees in its Statewide workforce by more than 20 percent from the number of full-time employees in its Statewide workforce in the last tax period prior to the credit amount approval under section 3 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-244), then the business shall forfeit its credit amount for that tax period and each subsequent tax period, until the first tax period for which documentation demonstrating the restoration of the business's Statewide workforce to the threshold levels required by the incentive agreement has been reviewed and approved by the authority, for which tax period and each subsequent tax period the full amount of the credit shall be allowed. (2)   If, in any tax period, the number of full-time employees employed by the business at the qualified business facility located within a qualified incentive area drops below 80 percent of the number of new and retained full-time jobs specified in the incentive agreement, then the business shall forfeit its credit amount for that tax period and each subsequent tax period, until the first tax period for which documentation demonstrating the restoration of the number of full-time employees employed by the business at the qualified business facility to 80 percent of the number of jobs specified in the incentive agreement. (3)   (a)  If the qualified business facility is sold by the owner in whole or in part during the eligibility period, the new owner shall not acquire the capital investment of the seller and the seller shall forfeit all credits for the tax period in which the sale occurs and all subsequent tax periods, provided however that any credits of the business shall remain unaffected. (b)   In connection with a regional distribution facility of foodstuffs, the business entity or entities which own or lease the facility shall qualify as a business regardless of: (i) the type of the business entity or entities which own or lease the facility; (ii) the ownership or leasing of the facility by more than one business entity; or (iii) the ownership of the business entity or entities which own or lease the facility. The ownership or leasing, whether by members, shareholders, partners, or other owners of the business entity or entities, shall be treated as ownership or leasing by affiliates. The members, shareholders, partners, or other ownership or leasing participants and others that are tenants in the facility shall be treated as affiliates for the purpose of counting the full-time employees and capital investments in the facility. The business entity or entities may distribute credits to members, shareholders, partners, or other ownership or leasing participants in accordance with their respective interests. If the business entity or entities or their members, shareholders, partners, or other ownership or leasing participants lease space in the facility to members, shareholders, partners, or other ownership or leasing participants or others as tenants in the facility, the leases shall be treated as a lease to an affiliate, and the business entity or entities shall not be subject to forfeiture of the credits. For the purposes of this section, leasing shall include subleasing and tenants shall include subtenants. (4)   (a)  For a project located within a Garden State Growth Zone, if, in any tax period, the number of full-time employees employed by the business at the qualified business facility located within a qualified incentive area increases above the number of full-time employees specified in the incentive agreement, then the business shall be entitled to an increased base credit amount for that tax period and each subsequent tax period, for each additional full-time employee added above the number of full-time employees specified in the incentive agreement, until the first tax period for which documentation demonstrating a reduction of the number of full-time employees employed by the business at the qualified business facility, at which time the tax credit amount will be adjusted accordingly pursuant to this section. (b)   For a project located within a Garden State Growth Zone which qualifies under the "Municipal Rehabilitation and Economic Recovery Act," P.L.2002, c.43 (C.52:27BBB-1 et al.), or which contains a Tourism District as established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2011, c.18 (C.5:12-219) and regulated by the Casino Reinvestment Development Authority, and which qualifies for a tax credit pursuant to subsubparagraph (ii) of subparagraphs (a) through (e) of paragraph (6) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-246), if, in any tax period the number of full-time employees employed by the business at the qualified business facility located within a qualified incentive area increases above the number of full-time employees specified in the incentive agreement such that the business shall then meet the minimum number of employees required in subparagraph (b), (c), (d), or (e) of paragraph (6) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-246), then the authority shall recalculate the total tax credit amount per full-time job by using the certified capital investment of the project allowable under the applicable subsubparagraph and the number of full-time jobs certified on the date of the recalculation and applying those numbers to subparagraph (b), (c), (d), or (e) of paragraph (6) of subsection d. of section 5 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-246), until the first tax period for which documentation demonstrating a reduction of the number of full-time employees employed by the business at the qualified business facility, at which time the tax credit amount shall be adjusted accordingly pursuant to this section. e.     The authority shall not enter into an incentive agreement with a business that has previously received incentives pursuant to the "Business Retention and Relocation Assistance Act," P.L.1996, c.25 (C.34:1B-112 et seq.), the "Business Employment Incentive Program Act," P.L.1996, c.26 (C.34:1B-124 et al.), or any other program administered by the authority unless: (1)   the business has satisfied all of its obligations underlying the previous award of incentives or is compliant with section 4 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-245); or (2)   the capital investment incurred and new or retained full-time jobs pledged by the business in the new incentive agreement are separate and apart from any capital investment or jobs underlying the previous award of incentives. f.     A business which has already applied for a tax credit incentive award prior to the effective date of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.), but who has not yet been approved for the tax credits, or has not executed an agreement with the authority, may proceed under that application or seek to amend the application or reapply for a tax credit incentive award for the same project or any part thereof for the purpose of availing itself of any more favorable provisions of the program. g.    A business that has entered into an incentive agreement may request before December 31, 2023 to terminate the incentive agreement, commencing with the 2020 tax period or any subsequent tax period ending on or before December 31, 2023, due to the COVID-19 public health emergency; provided that the business shall submit a certification from the business's chief executive officer or equivalent officer stating that the termination is due, directly or indirectly, to the public health emergency and describing the impact of the public health emergency on the business. All credits for the tax period in which the termination occurs and all subsequent tax periods shall be forfeited, provided however that any credits of the business shall remain unaffected. A termination agreement executed by the authority and business shall not be amended. h.    A business that has entered into an incentive agreement may request, before December 31, 2023, to reduce the number of new or retained full-time jobs specified in the incentive agreement based on a certification of the business of the eligible positions at the qualified business facility commencing with the 2020 tax period and, at the discretion of the business, whether the reduction shall continue for each subsequent tax period remaining in the eligibility period, provided that the business maintains the minimum number of new or retained full-time jobs required to be eligible pursuant to subsection c. of section 3 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-244). The reduction in employment shall first apply to the number of new full-time employees, and then shall apply to the number of retained full-time employees. The authority shall calculate a new tax credit total amount for the 2020 tax period and the remainder of the eligibility period based on the reduced employment and shall amend the incentive agreement to reflect the recalculated award amount. In no event shall the modification result in an increase in employment or tax credit amount. i.     Following the termination of the public health emergency declared by the Governor pursuant to Executive Order No. 103 of 2020, as extended, a business that has entered into an incentive agreement may elect, before December 31, 2023, to waive, for the period beginning on July 1, 2022 and ending on December 31, 2023, the requirement that a full-time employee who is employed by the business shall spend at least 60 percent of the employee's time at the qualified business facility; provided, however, that a business that makes such an election shall satisfy the following criteria: (1)   any full-time employee employed by the business shall spend at least 10 percent of the employee's time at the qualified business facility through the 2023 tax period; and (2)   following the receipt by the business of its tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate for the 2022 tax period, the business shall make a payment of an amount equal to five percent of the amount of tax credit the business receives for the 2022 tax period, which payment shall be made to the authority, and which payment the authority shall hold and make available for the provision of loans, guarantees, equity investments, and grants, or other forms of financing to support small business and downtown or commercial corridor activation activities within the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located, as may be designated by the chief executive officer of the authority. j.     For the 2024 tax period and all subsequent tax periods, a business may elect to waive for each tax period the requirement that a full-time employee who is employed by the business shall spend at least 60 percent of the employees time at the qualified business facility; provided, however, that a business that makes such an election shall satisfy the following criteria: (1) to qualify as an eligible position or full-time job, the business shall demonstrate to the authoritys satisfaction that the employee spends at least 80 percent of the employees work time in this State and that the eligible position requires an employee to have the employees primary place of work in this State, which need not be at the qualified business facility for the business to receive the full award amount; (2) not less than 80 percent of the aggregate withholdings of new and retained full-time jobs at the business shall be subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., except for an employee who is a resident of another state and whose income is not subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., due to a reciprocity agreement with another state; and (3) following the receipt by the business of its tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate for such tax period that an election is made, the business shall make a payment of an amount equal to five percent of the amount of tax credit the business receives for such tax period, which payment shall be made to the authority, and which payment the authority shall hold and make available for the provision of loans, guarantees, equity investments, and grants, or other forms of financing to support small business and downtown or commercial corridor activation activities within the municipality in which the qualified business facility is located, as may be designated by the chief executive officer of the authority. (cf: P.L.2022, c.134, s.4) 5.    Section 71 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-339) is amended to read as follows: 71.  a.  Beginning on the effective date of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), but prior to March 1, 2029, to be eligible for tax credits under the program, a business's chief executive officer, or equivalent officer, shall demonstrate to the authority at the time of application that: (1)   the business will make, acquire, or lease a capital investment at the qualified business facility equal to or greater than the applicable amount set forth in subsection b. of this section; (2)   the business will create or retain new and retained full-time jobs in the State in an amount equal to or greater than the applicable number set forth in subsection c. of this section; (3)   the qualified business facility is located in a qualified incentive area; (4)   the award of tax credits will be a material factor in the business's decision to create or retain the number of new and retained full-time jobs set forth in its application; (5)   the award of tax credits, the capital investment resultant from the award of tax credits, and the resultant creation and retention of new and retained full-time jobs will yield a net positive benefit to the State equaling at least 400 percent of the requested tax credit allocation amount, or for a phased project the requested tax credit allocation amount for the initial phase, and on a cumulative basis each phase thereafter, which determination shall be calculated prior to considering the value of the requested tax credit under the program and shall be based on the benefits generated during the period of time from approval through the end of the commitment period, or through the end of the longer period of extended commitment that the business may elect for purposes of receiving credit for benefits projected to occur after the expiration of the commitment period, except that: (a)   an award of tax credits to a business for a qualified business facility located in a distressed municipality or an enhanced area shall yield a net positive benefit to the State, based on the benefits generated during the period of time from approval through the end of the commitment period, that equals at least 300 percent of the requested tax credit amount; (b)   an award of tax credits to a business for a qualified business facility located in a government-restricted municipality, or for a mega project, shall yield a net positive benefit to the State, based on the benefits generated during the period of time from approval through the end of the commitment period, that equals at least 200 percent of the requested tax credit amount; (c)   the net economic benefits shall be evaluated on a present value basis with the requested tax credit allocation amount discounted to present value at the same discount rate as the benefits from capital investment resultant from the award of tax credits and the resultant retention and creation of full-time jobs as provided in subparagraph (d) of this paragraph; and (d)   a business may elect a period of extended commitment beyond the commitment period for which time the economic benefits shall be creditable to the determination of the net economic benefit of the project, and a business electing a period of extended commitment and failing to maintain the project through the expiration of that extended commitment period shall be obligated to repay a proportion of the incremental benefits received on account of having extended the commitment period, taking into consideration the number of years of extended commitment during which the business maintained the project; (e)   in making the determination required pursuant to this paragraph, the authority shall not consider the value of any taxes exempted, abated, rebated, or retained under the "Five-Year Exemption and Abatement Law," P.L.1991, c.441 (C.40A:21-1 et seq.), the "Long Term Tax Exemption Law," P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et al.), the "New Jersey Urban Enterprise Zones Act," P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-60 et seq.), or any other law that has the effect of lowering or eliminating the business's State or local tax liability, and the business's chief executive officer or equivalent officer shall certify, under the penalty of perjury, that all documents submitted, and factual assertions made, to the authority to demonstrate that the award of tax credits will yield a net positive benefit to the State in accordance with this paragraph are true and accurate at the time of submission; (f)   If, during the term of the program, the methodology used by the authority in projecting benefits of a project in making the determination required pursuant to this paragraph is modified, the respective percentages by which the benefits must exceed the requested tax credit allocation amount set forth pursuant to this paragraph (5) may be adjusted to ensure consistent application of the respective thresholds in this paragraph (5) applied to each application; (6)   the qualified business facility shall be in compliance with minimum environmental and sustainability standards; (7)   the project shall comply with the authority's affirmative action requirements, adopted pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1979, c.303 (C.34:1B-5.4); and (8)   (a)  each worker employed to perform construction work or building services work at the qualified business facility shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the worker's craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) and P.L.2005, c.379 (C.34:11-56.58 et seq.), unless: (i)    the work performed under the contract is performed at a qualified business facility owned by a landlord that is not a business receiving authority assistance; (ii)   the landlord is a party to the construction contract, building services contract, or both; and (iii)  the qualified business facility constitutes a lease of less than 35 percent of the entire facility at the time of contract and under any agreement to subsequently lease the qualified business facility. (b)   In accordance with section 1 of P.L.1979, c.303 (C.34:1B-5.1), nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as requiring the payment of prevailing wage for construction commencing more than two years after the authority has issued the first certificate of compliance pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 77 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-345). b.    (1)  The minimum capital investment required to be eligible under the program shall be as follows: (a)   for the rehabilitation, improvement, fit-out, or retrofit of an existing industrial, warehousing, logistics, or research and development portion of the premises for continued similar use by the business, a minimum investment of $20 per square foot of gross leasable area; (b)   for the new construction of an industrial, warehousing, logistics, or research and development portion of the premises for use by the business, a minimum investment of $60 per square foot of gross leasable area; (c)   for the rehabilitation, improvement, fit-out, or retrofit of existing portion of the premises that does not qualify pursuant to subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph, a minimum investment of $40 per square foot of gross leasable area; (d)   for the new construction of a portion of the premises that does not qualify pursuant to subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph, a minimum investment of $120 per square foot of gross leasable area; and (e)   for a small business, no new minimum capital investment shall be required, provided the applicant has demonstrated evidence satisfactory to the authority of its intent to remain in the State for the commitment period. (2)   In the event the business invests less than that amount set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection in the qualified business facility, the business shall donate the uninvested balance to the infrastructure fund established pursuant to section 79 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.52:27D-520). (3)   Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the authority may adopt, pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations adjusting the minimum capital investment amounts required under the program when necessary to respond to the prevailing economic conditions in the State. c.     (1)  The minimum number of new or retained full-time jobs required to be eligible under the program shall be as follows: (a)   for a small business, 25 percent growth of its workforce with new full-time jobs within the eligibility period in accordance with subsection e. of section 76 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-344); (b)   for a business engaged primarily in a targeted industry which does not qualify as a small business, 25 new full-time jobs; (c)   for any other business, a minimum of 35 new full-time jobs; (d)   for a business eligible for new full-time jobs under subparagraphs (b) or (c) of this paragraph, the business shall also be eligible for retained full-time jobs in addition to the new full-time jobs if the business will retain 150 retained full-time jobs when locating in a government-restricted municipality, 250 retained full-time jobs when locating in a qualified incentive tract or enhanced area municipality, or 500 retained full-time jobs when locating anywhere else in the State; (e)   for a business not eligible under subparagraphs (b), (c), or (d) of this paragraph and locating in a qualified incentive tract, enhanced area, or government-restricted municipality that will retain 500 or more retained full-time jobs, a minimum of the business's retained full-time jobs at the time of application; (f)   for a business not eligible under subparagraphs (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this paragraph and located in the State that will retain 1,000 or more retained full-time jobs, a minimum of the business's retained full-time jobs at the time of application. (2)   Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the authority may adopt, pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations adjusting the minimum number of new or retained full-time jobs required under the program when necessary to respond to the prevailing economic conditions in the State. d.    A business that provides and adheres to a plan that demonstrates that the qualified business facility is capable of accommodating more than half of the business's new and retained full-time employees as approved and that certifies, under the penalty of perjury, that not less than 80 percent of the withholdings of new and retained full-time jobs are subject to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. shall be eligible.  A business must demonstrate to the authoritys satisfaction that the full-time employee spends at least 80 percent of the employees work time in this State and that the eligible position requires an employee to have the employees primary place of work in this State, which need not be at the qualified business facility for the business to receive the full award amount.  The requirements set forth in this subsection may be modified by the authority to respond to an emergency, disaster, or other factors that result in employees of an eligible business having to work from a location other than the qualified business facility. e.     The chief executive officer of the business, or an equivalent officer, shall certify that all factual representations made by the business to the authority pursuant to subsection a. of this section are true under the penalty of perjury. f.     A business eligible pursuant to this section may submit an application to the authority in accordance with the provisions of section 72 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-340) on or after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.) but prior to March 1, 2029. (cf: P.L.2023, c.98, s.12) 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.